District of Columbia statutes.
7-2008

Annual report by Mayor.

The mayor shall submit to the Council, no later than 6 months after the end of each fiscal year, a report on the financial condition of the fund and the results of the operation of the fund for the fiscal year.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-220, § 9, 36 DCR 550
1981 Ed., § 6-3608.